Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
CHAPTER 5 Funds for Public Roads

Editor’s notes.

By resolution (Ga. L. 2007, p. 352), the General Assembly created the Joint Study Committee on Transportation Funding to undertake a study of the conditions, needs, issues, and problems with the funding of Georgia’s transportation system. The Committee made a report to the General Assembly and was abolished on December 31, 2007.